test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-mîciw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mîciw : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nimîcin   # I eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kimîcin   # you eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: mîciw   # he/she eats something

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-mîciyân   # as I eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-mîciyan, î-mîciyin]   # as you eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-mîcit   # as he/she eats something

      # Imp
      mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîci   # (you) eat something now
      

      # Prs # Ind
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nimîcin   # I eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kimîcin   # you eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: mîciw   # he/she eats something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nimîcinân   # we eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kimîcinaw, kimîcinânaw]   # we and you eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kimîcinâwâw   # you all eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: mîciwak   # they eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: mîcithiwa   # another/others eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Ind+X: [mîciniwiw, mîciniwan]   # someone eats something
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-mîciyân   # as I eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-mîciyan, î-mîciyin]   # as you eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-mîcit   # as he/she eats something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-mîciyâhk   # as we eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-mîciyahk   # as we and you eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-mîciyîk   # as you all eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-mîcicik, î-mîcitwâw]   # as they eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-mîcithit   # as another/others eat something
      PV/î+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [î-mîciniwik, î-mîciniwahk, î-mîcihk]   # as someone eats something
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-mîcin   # I ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-mîcin   # you ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: kî-mîciw   # he/she ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-mîcinân   # we ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kikî-mîcinaw, kikî-mîcinânaw]   # we and you ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-mîcinâwâw   # you all ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: kî-mîciwak   # they ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-mîcithiwa   # another/others ate something
      PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+X: [kî-mîciniwiw, kî-mîciniwan]   # someone ate something
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-mîciyân   # as I ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kî-mîciyan, î-kî-mîciyin]   # as you ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-mîcit   # as he/she ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-mîciyâhk   # as we ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-mîciyahk   # as we and you ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-mîciyîk   # as you all ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-kî-mîcicik, î-kî-mîcitwâw]   # as they ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-mîcithit   # as another/others ate something
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [î-kî-mîciniwik, î-kî-mîciniwahk, î-kî-mîcihk]   # as someone ate something
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-mîcin   # I am going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-mîcin   # you are going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: wî-mîciw   # he/she is going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-mîcinân   # we are going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kiwî-mîcinaw, kiwî-mîcinânaw]   # we and you are going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-mîcinâwâw   # you all are going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: wî-mîciwak   # they are going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-mîcithiwa   # another/others are going to eat something
      PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+X: [wî-mîciniwiw, wî-mîciniwan]   # someone is going to eat something
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-mîciyân   # as I am going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-wî-mîciyan, î-wî-mîciyin]   # as you are going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-mîcit   # as he/she is going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-mîciyâhk   # as we are going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-mîciyahk   # as we and you are going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-mîciyîk   # as you all are going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-wî-mîcicik, î-wî-mîcitwâw]   # as they are going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-mîcithit   # as another/others are going to eat something
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [î-wî-mîciniwik, î-wî-mîciniwahk, î-wî-mîcihk]   # as someone is going to eat something
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nika-mîcin   # I will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kika-mîcin   # you will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: ka-mîciw   # he/she will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nika-mîcinân   # we will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kika-mîcinaw, kika-mîcinânaw]   # we and you will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kika-mîcinâwâw   # you all will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: ka-mîciwak   # they will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-mîcithiwa   # another/others will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+X: [ka-mîciniwiw, ka-mîciniwan]   # someone will eat something
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-mîciyân   # I will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [ka-mîciyan, ka-mîciyin]   # you will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-mîcit   # he/she will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-mîciyâhk   # we will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-mîciyahk   # we and you will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-mîciyîk   # you all will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [ka-mîcicik, ka-mîcitwâw]   # they will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-mîcithit   # another/others will eat something
      PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [ka-mîciniwik, ka-mîciniwahk, ka-mîcihk]   # someone will eat something
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-mîciyân   # I eat something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [ta-mîciyan, ta-mîciyin]   # you eat something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-mîcit   # he/she eats something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-mîciyâhk   # we eat something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-mîciyahk   # we and you eat something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-mîciyîk   # you all eat something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [ta-mîcicik, ta-mîcitwâw]   # they eat something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-mîcithit   # another/others eat something
      PV/ta+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [ta-mîciniwik, ta-mîciniwahk, ta-mîcihk]   # someone eats something
      

      # Fut # Cond
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mîciyâni   # when I eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: [mîciyani, mîciyini]   # when you eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mîcici   # when he/she eats something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mîciyâhki   # when we eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: mîciyahki   # when we and you eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mîciyîko   # when you all eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mîcitwâwi   # when they eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mîcithici   # when another/others eat something
      mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+X: [mîcihki, mîcihkwâwi]   # when someone eats something
      

      # Imp # Imm
      mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîci   # (you) eat something now
      mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mîcitân   # let you and us eat something now
      mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcik   # (you all) eat something now
      

      # Imp # Del
      mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcihkan   # (you) eat something later
      mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mîcihkahk   # let you and us eat something later
      mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcihkîk   # (you all) eat something later
      
